Colorado statutes. TITLE 14 Domestic Matters
ARTICLE 10 UNIFORM DISSOLUTION OF MARRIAGE ACT
14-10-123.6. Required notice of prior restraining orders to prevent domestic abuse - proceedings concerning parental responsibilities relating to a child - resources for family services.

The general assembly hereby finds, determines, and declares that domestic violence is a pervasive problem in society and that a significant portion of domestic violence in society occurs in or near the home. The general assembly further recognizes research demonstrating that children in a home where domestic violence occurs are at greater risk of emotional, psychological, and physical harm. Studies have found that eighty to ninety percent of the children living in homes with domestic violence are aware of the violence. The general assembly finds that emerging research has established that these children are at greater risk of the following: Psychological, social, and behavioral problems; higher rates of academic problems; more physical illnesses, particularly stress-associated disorders; and a greater propensity to exhibit aggressive and violent behavior, sometimes carrying violent and violence-tolerant roles to their adult relationships. Studies have also noted that children are affected to varying degrees by witnessing violence in the home, and each child should be assessed on an independent basis. Accordingly, the general assembly determines that it is in the best interests of the children of the state of Colorado for the courts to advise the parents or guardians of children affected by domestic violence about the availability of resources and services and for such persons to be provided with information concerning the resources and services available to aid in the positive development of their children. It is the intent of the general assembly that such information would increase the awareness of the possible effects of domestic violence on children in the home, while providing the parents and legal guardians of these children with a comprehensive resource of available children's services as well as potential financial resources to assist parents and legal guardians seeking to retain services for their children affected by domestic violence.

When filing a proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities relating to a child pursuant to this article, the filing party shall have a duty to disclose to the court the existence of any prior temporary or permanent restraining orders to prevent domestic abuse issued pursuant to article 14 of title 13, C.R.S., and any emergency protection orders issued pursuant to section 13-14-103, C.R.S., entered against either party by any court within two years prior to the filing of the proceeding. The disclosure required pursuant to this section shall address the subject matter of the previous restraining orders or emergency protection orders, including the case number and jurisdiction issuing such orders.

After the filing of the petition, the court shall advise the parties concerning domestic violence services and potential financial resources that may be available and shall strongly encourage the parties to obtain such services for their children, in appropriate cases. If the parties' children participate in such services, the court shall apportion the costs of such services between the parties as it deems appropriate.

The parties to a domestic relations petition filed pursuant to this article shall receive information concerning domestic violence services and potential financial resources that may be available.

Source:

L. 95:

Entire section added, p. 83, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1379, § 7, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 99:

Entire section amended, p. 502, § 10, effective July 1.

L. 2001:

Entire section amended, p. 979, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2004:

(2) amended, p. 555, § 11, effective July 1.

14-10-123.7. Parental education - legislative declaration.

The general assembly recognizes research that documents the negative impact divorce and separation can have on children when the parents continue the marital conflict, expose the children to this conflict, or place the children in the middle of the conflict or when one parent drops out of the child's life. This research establishes that children of divorce or separation may exhibit a decreased ability to function academically, socially, and psychologically because of the stress of the divorce or separation process. The general assembly also finds that, by understanding the process of divorce and its impact on both adults and children, parents can more effectively help and support their children during this time of family reconfiguration. Accordingly, the general assembly finds that it is in the best interests of children to authorize courts to establish, or contract with providers for the establishment of, educational programs for separating, divorcing, and divorced parents with minor children. The intent of these programs is to educate parents about the divorce process and its impact on adults and children and to teach coparenting skills and strategies so that parents may continue to parent their children in a cooperative manner.

A court may order a parent whose child is under eighteen years of age to attend a program designed to provide education concerning the impact of separation and divorce on children in cases in which the parent of a minor is a named party in a dissolution of marriage proceeding, a legal separation proceeding, a proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities, parenting time proceedings, or postdecree proceedings involving the allocation of parental responsibilities or parenting time or proceedings in which the parent is the subject of a protection order issued pursuant to this article.

Each judicial district, or combination of judicial districts as designated by the chief justice of the Colorado supreme court, may establish an educational program for divorcing and separating parents who are parties to any of the types of proceedings specified in subsection (2) of this section or arrange for the provision of such educational programs by private providers through competitively negotiated contracts. The educational program shall inform parents about the divorce process and its impact on adults and children and shall teach parents coparenting skills and strategies so that they may continue to parent their children in a cooperative manner. Any such educational program shall be administered and monitored by the implementing judicial district or districts and shall be paid for by the participating parents in accordance with each parent's ability to pay.

Source:

L. 96:

Entire section added, p. 249, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 97:

(2) amended, p. 80, § 1, effective March 24.

L. 98:

(2) amended, p. 1380, § 8, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2003:

(2) amended, p. 1012, § 17, effective July 1.

14-10-123.8. Access to records.

Access to information pertaining to a minor child, including but not limited to medical, dental, and school records, shall not be denied to any party allocated parental responsibilities, unless otherwise ordered by the court for good cause shown.

Source:

L. 98:

Entire section added, p. 1380, § 9, effective February 1, 1999.

14-10-124. Best interests of the child.

Legislative declaration. While co-parenting is not appropriate in all circumstances following dissolution of marriage or legal separation, the general assembly finds and declares that, in most circumstances, it is in the best interest of all parties to encourage frequent and continuing contact between each parent and the minor children of the marriage after the parents have separated or dissolved their marriage. In order to effectuate this goal when appropriate, the general assembly urges parents to share the rights and responsibilities of child-rearing and to encourage the love, affection, and contact between the children and the parents.

(1.3)

Definitions.

For purposes of this section and section 14-10-129 (2)(c), unless the context otherwise requires:

"Domestic violence" means an act of violence or a threatened act of violence upon a person with whom the actor is or has been involved in an intimate relationship, and may include any act or threatened act against a person or against property, including an animal, when used as a method of coercion, control, punishment, intimidation, or revenge directed against a person with whom the actor is or has been involved in an intimate relationship.

"Intimate relationship" means a relationship between spouses, former spouses, past or present unmarried couples, or persons who are both parents of the same child regardless of whether the persons have been married or have lived together at any time.

"Sexual assault" has the same meaning as set forth in section 19-1-103.

(1.5)

Allocation of parental responsibilities.

The court shall determine the allocation of parental responsibilities, including parenting time and decision-making responsibilities, in accordance with the best interests of the child giving paramount consideration to the child's safety and the physical, mental, and emotional conditions and needs of the child as follows:

Determination of parenting time. The court, upon the motion of either party or upon its own motion, may make provisions for parenting time that the court finds are in the best interests of the child, with the child's safety always paramount, unless the court finds, after a hearing, that parenting time by the party would endanger the child's physical health or significantly impair the child's emotional development. In addition to a finding that parenting time would endanger the child's physical health or significantly impair the child's emotional development, in any order imposing or continuing a parenting time restriction, the court shall enumerate the specific factual findings supporting the restriction, including findings related to domestic violence, child abuse, and child sexual abuse, and may enumerate the conditions that the restricted party could fulfill in order to seek modification in the parenting plan. When a claim of child abuse or neglect, domestic violence, or sexual assault where there is also a claim that the child was conceived as a result of the sexual assault has been made to the court, or the court has reason to believe that a party has committed child abuse or neglect, domestic violence, or sexual assault where there is also a claim that the child was conceived as a result of the sexual assault, prior to determining parenting time, the court shall follow the provisions of subsection (4) of this section. In determining the best interests of the child for purposes of parenting time, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including:

The wishes of the child's parents as to parenting time;

The wishes of the child if he or she is sufficiently mature to express reasoned and independent preferences as to the parenting time schedule;

The interaction and interrelationship of the child with his or her parents, his or her siblings, and any other person who may significantly affect the child's best interests;

(III.5) Any report related to domestic violence that is submitted to the court by a child and family investigator, if one is appointed pursuant to section 14-10-116.5; a professional parental responsibilities evaluator, if one is appointed pursuant to section 14-10-127; or a legal representative of the child, if one is appointed pursuant to section 14-10-116. The court may consider other testimony regarding domestic violence from the parties, experts, therapists for any parent or child, the department of human services, parenting time supervisors, school personnel, or other lay witnesses.

The child's adjustment to his or her home, school, and community;

The mental and physical health of all individuals involved, except that a disability alone shall not be a basis to deny or restrict parenting time;

The ability of the parties to encourage the sharing of love, affection, and contact between the child and the other party; except that, if the court determines that a party is acting to protect the child from witnessing domestic violence or from being a victim of child abuse or neglect or domestic violence, the party's protective actions shall not be considered with respect to this factor;

Whether the past pattern of involvement of the parties with the child reflects a system of values, time commitment, and mutual support;

The physical proximity of the parties to each other as this relates to the practical considerations of parenting time;

and (X) Repealed.

(XI) The ability of each party to place the needs of the child ahead of his or her own needs.

Allocation of decision-making responsibility. The court, upon the motion of either party or its own motion, shall allocate the decision-making responsibilities between the parties based upon the best interests of the child. In determining decision-making responsibility, the court may allocate the decision-making responsibility with respect to each issue affecting the child mutually between both parties or individually to one or the other party or any combination thereof. When a claim of child abuse or neglect or domestic violence has been made to the court, or the court has reason to believe that a party has committed child abuse or neglect, domestic violence, or sexual assault where there is also a claim that the child in question was conceived as a result of the sexual assault, prior to allocating decision-making responsibility, the court shall follow the provisions of subsection (4) of this section. In determining the best interests of the child for purposes of allocating decision-making responsibilities, the court shall consider, in addition to the factors set forth in paragraph (a) of this subsection (1.5), all relevant factors including:

Credible evidence of the ability of the parties to cooperate and to make decisions jointly;

Whether the past pattern of involvement of the parties with the child reflects a system of values, time commitment, and mutual support that would indicate an ability as mutual decision makers to provide a positive and nourishing relationship with the child;

Whether an allocation of mutual decision-making responsibility on any one or a number of issues will promote more frequent or continuing contact between the child and each of the parties.

and (V) Repealed.

(1.7) Pursuant to section 14-10-123.4, children have the right to have the determination of matters relating to parental responsibilities based upon the best interests of the child. In contested hearings on final orders regarding the allocation of parental responsibilities, the court shall make findings on the record concerning the factors the court considered and the reasons why the allocation of parental responsibilities is in the best interests of the child.

The court shall not consider conduct of a party that does not affect that party's relationship to the child.

In determining parenting time or decision-making responsibilities, the court shall not presume that any person is better able to serve the best interests of the child because of that person's sex.

(3.5) A request by either party for genetic testing shall not prejudice the requesting party in the allocation of parental responsibilities pursuant to subsection (1.5) of this section.

When a claim of child abuse or neglect, domestic violence, or sexual assault where there is also a claim that the child was conceived as a result of the sexual assault has been made to the court, or the court has reason to believe that a party has committed child abuse or neglect, domestic violence, or sexual assault that resulted in the conception of the child, prior to allocating parental responsibilities, including parenting time and decision-making responsibility, and prior to considering the factors set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1.5) of this section, the court shall consider the following factors:

(I) Whether one of the parties has committed an act of child abuse or neglect as defined in section 18-6-401, C.R.S., or as defined under the law of any state, which factor must be supported by a preponderance of the evidence. If the court finds that one of the parties has committed child abuse or neglect, then it shall not be in the best interests of the child to allocate mutual decision-making with respect to any issue over the objection of the other party or the legal representative of the child.

(II) Whether one of the parties has committed an act of domestic violence, has engaged in a pattern of domestic violence, or has a history of domestic violence, which factor must be supported by a preponderance of the evidence. If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that one of the parties has committed domestic violence:

It shall not be in the best interests of the child to allocate mutual decision-making responsibility over the objection of the other party or the legal representative of the child, unless the court finds that there is credible evidence of the ability of the parties to make decisions cooperatively in the best interest of the child in a manner that is safe for the abused party and the child; and

The court shall not appoint a parenting coordinator solely to ensure that mutual decision-making can be accomplished.

(III) Whether one of the parties has committed an act of sexual assault resulting in the conception of the child, which factor must be supported by a preponderance of the evidence. If the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that one of the parties has committed sexual assault and the child was conceived as a result of the sexual assault, there is a rebuttable presumption that it is not in the best interests of the child to allocate sole or split decision-making authority to the party found to have committed sexual assault or to allocate mutual decision-making between a party found to have committed sexual assault and the party who was sexually assaulted with respect to any issue.

(IV) If one of the parties is found by a preponderance of the evidence to have committed sexual assault resulting in the conception of the child, whether it is in the best interests of the child to prohibit or limit the parenting time of that party with the child.

The court shall consider the additional factors set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (1.5) of this section in light of any finding of child abuse or neglect, domestic violence, or sexual assault resulting in the conception of a child pursuant to this subsection (4).

If a party is absent or leaves home because of an act or threatened act of domestic violence committed by the other party, such absence or leaving shall not be a factor in determining the best interests of the child.

When the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that one of the parties has committed child abuse or neglect, domestic violence, or sexual assault resulting in the conception of the child, the court shall consider, as the primary concern, the safety and well-being of the child and the abused party.

When the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that one of the parties has committed child abuse or neglect, domestic violence, or sexual assault resulting in the conception of the child, in formulating or approving a parenting plan, the court shall consider conditions on parenting time that ensure the safety of the child and of the abused party. In addition to any provisions set forth in subsection (7) of this section that are appropriate, the parenting plan in these cases may include, but is not limited to, the following provisions:

An order limiting contact between the parties to contact that the court deems is safe and that minimizes unnecessary communication between the parties;

An order that requires the exchange of the child for parenting time to occur in a protected setting determined by the court;

An order for supervised parenting time;

An order restricting overnight parenting time;

An order that restricts the party who has committed domestic violence, sexual assault resulting in the conception of the child, or child abuse or neglect from possessing or consuming alcohol or controlled substances during parenting time or for twenty-four hours prior to the commencement of parenting time;

An order directing that the address of the child or of any party remain confidential;

An order that imposes any other condition on one or more parties that the court determines is necessary to protect the child, another party, or any other family or household member of a party; and

An order that requires child support payments to be made through the child support registry to avoid the need for any related contact between the parties and an order that the payments be treated as a nondisclosure of information case.

When the court finds by a preponderance of the evidence that one of the parties has committed domestic violence, the court may order the party to submit to a domestic violence evaluation. If the court determines, based upon the results of the evaluation, that treatment is appropriate, the court may order the party to participate in domestic violence treatment. At any time, the court may require a subsequent evaluation to determine whether additional treatment is necessary. If the court awards parenting time to a party who has been ordered to participate in domestic violence treatment, the court may order the party to obtain a report from the treatment provider concerning the party's progress in treatment and addressing any ongoing safety concerns regarding the party's parenting time. The court may order the party who has committed domestic violence to pay the costs of the domestic violence evaluations and treatment.

Repealed.

In the event of a medical emergency, either party shall be allowed to obtain necessary medical treatment for the minor child or children without being in violation of the order allocating decision-making responsibility or in contempt of court.

In order to implement an order allocating parental responsibilities, both parties may submit a parenting plan or plans for the court's approval that shall address both parenting time and the allocation of decision-making responsibilities. If no parenting plan is submitted or if the court does not approve a submitted parenting plan, the court, on its own motion, shall formulate a parenting plan that shall address parenting time and the allocation of decision-making responsibilities. When issues relating to parenting time are contested, and in other cases where appropriate, the parenting plan must be as specific as possible to clearly address the needs of the family as well as the current and future needs of the aging child. In general, the parenting plan may include, but is not limited to, the following provisions:

A designation of the type of decision-making awarded;

A practical schedule of parenting time for the child, including holidays and school vacations;

A procedure for the exchanges of the child for parenting time, including the location of the exchanges and the party or parties responsible for the child's transportation;

A procedure for communicating with each other about the child, including methods for communicating and frequency of communication;

A procedure for communication between a parent and the child outside of that parent's parenting time, including methods for communicating and frequency of communication; and

Any other orders in the best interests of the child.

The court may order mediation, pursuant to section 13-22-311, C.R.S., to assist the parties in formulating or modifying a parenting plan or in implementing a parenting plan specified in subsection (7) of this section and may allocate the cost of said mediation between the parties.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 529, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-24.

L. 79:

(3) added, p. 645, § 1, effective March 2.

L. 81:

(4) added, p. 904, § 1, effective May 22.

L. 83:

(1) R&RE and (1.5) and (5) added, p. 647, §§ 3, 4, effective June 10.

L. 87:

(1.5)(g) to (1.5)(m) added and (5) repealed, pp. 574, 576, §§ 3, 6, effective July 1; (1.5)(m) repealed, p. 1578, § 22, effective July 1.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1380, § 10, effective February 1, 1999.

L. 2005:

(1.5)(b)(IV) and (1.5)(b)(V) amended, p. 961, § 6, effective July 1; (3.5) added, p. 377, § 2, effective January 1, 2006.

L. 2010:

(1.3) added and (1.5)(a)(X), (1.5)(b)(V), and (4) amended, (HB 10-1135), ch. 87, p. 290, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2013:

(1), IP(1.5), IP(1.5)(a), (1.5)(a)(VI), IP(1.5)(b), (4), and (7) amended, (1.5)(a)(IX), (1.5)(a)(X), (1.5)(b)(IV), and (1.5)(b)(V) repealed, and (1.7) added, (HB 13-1259), ch. 218, p. 995, § 2, effective July 1; IP(1.5)(a) amended, (HB 13-1243), ch. 124, p. 418, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1.3)(c), (4)(a)(III), and (4)(a)(IV) added and IP(1.5)(a), IP(1.5)(b), IP(4)(a), (4)(b), (4)(d), and (4)(e) amended, (HB 14-1162), ch. 167, p. 591, § 7, effective July 1.

L. 2021:

IP(1.5)(a) amended and (1.5)(a)(III.5) added, (HB 21-1228), ch. 292, p. 1731, § 5, effective June 22; (1.3)(c) amended, (SB 21-059), ch. 136, p. 712, § 19, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

(1) Amendments to the introductory portion to subsection (1.5)(a) by House Bill 13-1259 and House Bill 13-1243 were harmonized.

(2) Subsections (4)(a)(I) and (4)(a)(II) are similar to former § 14-10-124 (1.5)(b)(IV) and (1.5)(b)(V) as they existed prior to August 7, 2013.

Cross references:

(1) For the "Uniform Child-custody Jurisdiction and Enforcement Act", see article 13 of this title 14.

(2) For the legislative declarations contained in the 2005 act amending subsections (1.5)(b)(IV) and (1.5)(b)(V), see sections 1 and 3 of chapter 244, Session Laws of Colorado 2005. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1228, see section 1 of chapter 292, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

14-10-124.3. Stay of proceedings - criminal charges of allegations of sexual assault. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (SB 13-227), ch. 353, p. 2059, § 4, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

Entire section repealed, (HB 14-1162), ch. 167, p. 586, § 2, effective July 1.

14-10-125. Temporary orders.

A party to a proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities may move for a temporary order. The court may allocate temporary parental responsibilities, including temporary parenting time and temporary decision-making responsibility, after a hearing.

If a proceeding for dissolution of marriage or legal separation is dismissed, any temporary order concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities is vacated unless a parent or the person allocated parental responsibilities moves that the proceeding continue as a proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities and the court finds, after a hearing, that the circumstances of the parents and the best interests of the child require that a decree concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities be issued.

If a proceeding concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities commenced in the absence of a petition for dissolution of marriage or legal separation is dismissed, any temporary order concerning the allocation of parental responsibilities is vacated.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 530, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-25.

L. 84:

(1) amended, p. 479, § 1, effective March 16.

L. 98:

Entire section amended, p. 1383, § 11, effective February 1, 1999.

14-10-126. Interviews.

The court may interview the child in chambers to ascertain the child's wishes as to the allocation of parental responsibilities. The court may permit counsel to be present at the interview. The court shall cause a record of the interview to be made, and it shall be made part of the record in the case.

The court may seek the advice of professional personnel whether or not they are employed on a regular basis by the court. The advice given shall be in writing and shall be made available by the court to counsel of record, parties, and other expert witnesses upon request, but it shall otherwise be considered confidential and shall be sealed and shall not be open to inspection, except by consent of the court. Counsel may call for cross-examination any professional personnel consulted by the court.

Source:

L. 71:

R&RE, p. 530, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 46-1-26.

L. 98:

(1) amended, p. 1384, § 12, effective February 1, 1999.